Maryland, session 2026, HB1489.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
8–110.
(a) This section applies only to an individual who:
(1) (i) was convicted as an adult for an offense committed when the
individual was a minor;
(ii) was sentenced for the offense before October 1, 2021; and
(iii) has been imprisoned for at least 20 years for the offense; or
(2) (i) was convicted of an offense committed when the individual was
at least 18 years old but younger than 25 years old;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1489*

HOUSE BILL 1489
(ii) was not sentenced to life without the possibility of parole;
(iii) is not a sex offender, as defined in § 11–701 of this article;
(iv) has been imprisoned for at least 20 years for the offense; and
(v) was not convicted of [murder involving a victim who was a first
responder, as defined in § 18–213.2 of the Health – General Article, who was killed in the
line of duty]:
1. MURDER OR MANSLAUGHTER OF A VIABLE FETUS
UNDER § 2–103 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
2. MURDER IN THE FIRST DEGREE UNDER § 2–201 OF
THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
3. MURDER IN THE SECOND DEGREE UNDER § 2–204 OF
THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
4. ATTEMPTED MURDER IN THE FIRST DEGREE UNDER §
2–205 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
5. ATTEMPTED MURDER IN THE SECOND DEGREE UNDER
§ 2–206 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
6. MANSLAUGHTER UNDER § 2–207 OF THE CRIMINAL
LAW ARTICLE;
7. MANSLAUGHTER BY VEHICLE OR VESSEL UNDER §
2–209 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
8. CAUSING THE DEATH OF ANOTHER BY OPERATION OF
VEHICLE OR VESSEL IN A CRIMINALLY NEGLIGENT MANNER UNDER § 2–210 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
9. HOMICIDE BY MOTOR VEHICLE OR VESSEL WHILE
UNDER THE INFLUENCE OF ALCOHOL OR UNDER THE INFLUENCE OF ALCOHOL PER
SE UNDER § 2–503 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
10. HOMICIDE BY MOTOR VEHICLE OR VESSEL WHILE
IMPAIRED BY ALCOHOL UNDER § 2–504 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;

HOUSE BILL 1489 3
11. HOMICIDE BY MOTOR VEHICLE OR VESSEL WHILE
IMPAIRED BY DRUGS UNDER § 2–505 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
12. HOMICIDE BY MOTOR VEHICLE OR VESSEL WHILE
IMPAIRED BY A CONTROLLED DANGEROUS SUBSTANCE UNDER § 2–506 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
13. CHILD ABUSE RESULTING IN DEATH UNDER § 3–601
OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE; OR
14. COMMISSION OF A HATE CRIME RESULTING IN THE
DEATH OF A VICTIM UNDER § 10–304 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
(b) (1) An individual described in subsection (a) of this section may file a
motion with the court to reduce the duration of the sentence.
(2) A court shall conduct a hearing on a motion to reduce the duration of a
sentence.
(3) (i) The individual shall be present at the hearing, unless the
individual waives the right to be present.
(ii) The requirement that the individual be present at the hearing is
satisfied if the hearing is conducted by video conference.
(4) (i) The individual may introduce evidence in support of the motion
at the hearing.
(ii) The State may introduce evidence in support of or in opposition
to the motion at the hearing.
(5) (i) Notice of the hearing under this subsection shall be given to the
victim or the victim’s representative as provided in §§ 11–104 and 11–503 of this article.
(ii) A victim or victim’s representative may submit a victim impact
statement to the court regarding the impact of the crime and the proposed sentence
reduction.
(iii) A victim may not be cross–examined when presenting a victim
impact statement under this section.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, after a hearing under subsection
(b) of this section, the court may reduce the duration of the sentence if the court determines
that:
(1) the individual is not a danger to the public; and

HOUSE BILL 1489
(2) the interests of justice will be better served by a reduced sentence.
(d) A court shall consider the following factors when determining whether to
reduce the duration of a sentence under this section:
(1) the individual’s age at the time of the offense;
(2) the nature of the offense and the history and characteristics of the
individual;
(3) whether the individual has substantially complied with the rules of the
institution in which the individual has been confined;
(4) whether the individual has completed an educational, vocational, or
other program;
(5) whether the individual has demonstrated maturity, rehabilitation, and
fitness to reenter society sufficient to justify a sentence reduction;
(6) any statement offered by a victim or a victim’s representative;
(7) any report of a physical, mental, or behavioral examination of the
individual conducted by a health professional;
(8) the individual’s family and community circumstances at the time of the
offense, including any history of trauma, abuse, or involvement in the child welfare system;
(9) the extent of the individual’s role in the offense and, if the individual
was a minor at the time of the offense, whether and to what extent an adult was involved
in the offense;
(10) the diminished culpability of a juvenile as compared to an adult,
including an inability to fully appreciate risks and consequences, if applicable; and
(11) any other factor the court deems relevant.
(e) (1) The court shall issue its decision to grant or deny a motion to reduce
the duration of a sentence in writing.
(2) The decision shall address the factors listed in subsection (d) of this
section.
(3) (i) The court shall order an individual to stay away from and refrain
from contact with a victim and victim’s family if the individual is released, unless the victim
requests otherwise.

HOUSE BILL 1489 5
(ii) The court may impose any other conditions of release necessary
to promote victim safety and peace of mind.
(f) (1) If the court denies or grants, in part, a motion to reduce the duration of
a sentence under this section, the individual may not file a second motion to reduce the
duration of that sentence for at least 3 years.
(2) If the court denies or grants, in part, a second motion to reduce the
duration of a sentence, the individual may not file a third motion to reduce the duration of
that sentence for at least 3 years.
(3) With regard to any specific sentence, an individual may not file a fourth
motion to reduce the duration of the sentence.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.